Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4705
Community property presumption.

All property acquired by a community-property spouse when domiciled in a jurisdiction where community property then could be acquired by the community-property spouse by operation of law is presumed to be community property. This presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence.

Laws 2024, LB83, § 5.